North Carolina, session 2025, HB316.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. NC CHILD TAX CREDIT
SECTION 1.1. G.S. 105-151.11 is reenacted as it existed immediately before its
expiration, is recodified as G.S. 105-153.12, and reads as rewritten:
"§ 105-153.12. Credit for child care and certain employment-related expenses.
(a) Credit. – A person who is allowed a credit against federal income tax for a percentage
of employment-related expenses under section 21 of the Code shall be allowed as a credit against
the tax imposed by this Part an amount equal to the applicable percentage of the
employment-related expenses as defined in section 21(b)(2) of the Code. In order to claim the
credit allowed by this section, the taxpayer must provide with the tax return the information
required by the Secretary.
(a1) Applicable Percentage. – For employment-related expenses that are incurred only
with respect to one or more dependents who are seven 18 years old or older up to 25 years old
and are not physically or mentally incapable of caring for themselves, the applicable percentage
is the appropriate percentage in the column labeled "Percentage A" in the table below, based on
the taxpayer's adjusted gross income determined under the Code. For employment-related
expenses that are incurred only with respect to one or more dependents who are 12 years old up
to 18 years old and are not physically or mentally incapable of caring for themselves, the
applicable percentage is the appropriate percentage in the column labeled "Percentage B" in the
table below, based on the taxpayer's adjusted gross income determined under the Code. For
employment-related expenses that are incurred only with respect to one or more dependents who
are 6 years old up to 12 years old and are not physically or mentally incapable of caring for
themselves, the applicable percentage is the appropriate percentage in the column labeled
"Percentage C" in the table below, based on the taxpayer's adjusted gross income determined
*H316-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
under the Code. For employment-related expenses with respect to any other qualifying
individual, the applicable percentage is the appropriate percentage in the column labeled
"Percentage B" D" in the table below, based on the taxpayer's adjusted gross income determined
under the Code.
Filing Status Adjusted Gross Percentage A Percentage B Percentage C Percentage D
Income

Head of Up to $20,000 9%7% 13%9% 11% 13%
Household
Over $20,000
up to $32,000 8%6.3% 11.5%8% 9.8% 11.5%

Over $32,000 7%5.5% 10%7% 8.5% 10%

Surviving
Spouse or
Joint Return Up to $25,000 9%7% 13%9% 11% 13%

Over $25,000
up to $40,000 8%6.3% 11.5%8% 9.8% 11.5%

Over $40,000 7%5.5% 10%7% 8.5% 10%

Single Up to $15,000 9%7% 13%9% 11% 13%

Over $15,000
up to $24,000 8%6.3% 11.5%8% 9.8% 11.5%

Over $24,000 7%5.5% 10%7% 8.5% 10%

Married
Filing
Separately Up to $12,500 9%7% 13%9% 11% 13%

Over $12,500
up to $20,000 8%6.3% 11.5%8% 9.8% 11.5%

Over $20,000 7%5.5% 10%7% 8.5% 10%
(b) Employment Related Expenses. – The amount of employment-related expenses for
which a credit may be claimed may not exceed three thousand dollars ($3,000) if the taxpayer's
household includes one qualifying individual, as defined in section 21(b)(1) of the Code, and
may not exceed six thousand dollars ($6,000) if the taxpayer's household includes more than one
qualifying individual. The amount of employment-related expenses for which a credit may be
claimed is reduced by the amount of employer-provided dependent care assistance excluded from
gross income.
(c) Limitations. – A nonresident or part-year resident who claims the credit allowed by
this section shall reduce the amount of the credit by multiplying it by the fraction calculated under
G.S. 105-134.5(b) or (c), G.S. 105-153.4(b) or (c), as appropriate. No credit shall be allowed
under this section for amounts deducted in calculating North Carolina taxable income. The credit
allowed by this section may not exceed the amount of tax imposed by this Part for the taxable
Page 2 House Bill 316-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
year reduced by the sum of all credits allowable, except for payments of tax made by or on behalf
of the taxpayer."

PART II. EXPAND NC PRE-K PROGRAM
SECTION 2.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
two hundred million dollars ($200,000,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027
fiscal biennium for the North Carolina Prekindergarten (NC Pre-K) program to expand the
number of slots by 32,000 and cover all eligible children 4 years of age.

PART III. INCREASE SUBSIDIZED CHILD CARE FUNDING
SECTION 3.1. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Child Development and Early Education, the sum of
thirty-five million dollars ($35,000,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal
biennium to increase funding for subsidized child care.

PART IV. FUND PUBLIC SCHOOL LUNCHES
SECTION 4.1. G.S. 115C-263 reads as rewritten:
"§ 115C-263. School nutrition services.
(a) As a part of the function of the public school system, local boards of education public
school units shall have a school food authority to provide to the extent practicable school nutrition
services in the schools under their jurisdiction. jurisdiction by offering students lunch at no cost
to the student. A school food authority may offer students a breakfast option at a cost to the
student, unless the student is eligible for the School Breakfast Program. All school nutrition
services made available under this authority shall be provided in accordance with federal
guidelines established by the Food and Nutrition Service of the United States Department of
Agriculture.
(b) The To the extent that funds are made available for the purpose, the State Board of
Education shall allocate funds to school food authorities at public school units for the purpose of
providing healthy lunches at no cost to students. In issuing the allocation, the Board shall do the
following:
(1) Determine the amount to allocate to each school food authority based on an
evaluation of the authority's nutrition services. The Board shall develop the
method and criteria for the evaluation, which at a minimum shall account for
the following:
a. The size of the schools served by the school food authority as
determined by Average Daily Membership.
b. The number of students that are eligible for free or reduced-price lunch
and the estimated receipts from the National School Lunch Program.
c. The funds actually expended in the prior year, which may be waived
if the school food authority was not in operation in the year prior.
d. The extent to which the nutrition services promote health and wellness
by providing food that is of high quality and nutrient content.
e. The extent to which the school food authority uses locally sourced
food and products.
f. Any other information the Board deems relevant to the cost and
operation of the nutrition services.
(2) Ensure the funds are distributed on a fair and equitable basis.
(3) Issue the allocation at the beginning of each fiscal year, except that the Board
may reserve for future allocation a reasonable amount, not to exceed ten
percent (10%) of the total funds available for providing nutrition services.
House Bill 316-First Edition Page 3

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
(c) The State Board of Education may adopt rules regulating the provision of school
nutrition that impose additional restrictions that are not inconsistent with the federal guidelines.
(d) Funds allocated pursuant to this section shall supplement and not supplant any other
funds from any other source provided for the same purpose."
SECTION 4.2. G.S. 115C-264(a) reads as rewritten:
"(a) Local boards of education operating school nutrition programs shall participate in the
federal National School Lunch Program established by the federal government. and, if eligible,
the Community Eligibility Provision Program. School nutrition programs shall be under the
jurisdiction of the Division of School Nutrition of the Department of Public Instruction."
SECTION 4.3 G.S. 115C-218.75 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(p) A charter school shall provide school nutrition services in accordance with
G.S. 115C-263 and G.S. 115C-264."
SECTION 4.4. G.S. 115C-238.72(b) reads as rewritten:
"(b) Food Nutrition Service. – The local school administrative unit identified by resolution
shall provide, to the extent practicable, school food provide school nutrition services to the
regional school. school in accordance with G.S. 115C-263 and G.S. 115C-264. For purposes of
federal funding through the National School Lunch Program or other federally supported food
nutrition service programs, the local school administrative unit identified by resolution shall be
permitted to include eligible students enrolled in the regional school. Other participating units
shall not include students enrolled in the regional school for purposes of federally supported food
nutrition service programs."
SECTION 4.5. G.S. 115C-150.14 is amended by adding a new subsection to read:
"(a1) A school governed by this Article shall provide school nutrition services in
accordance with G.S. 115C-263 and G.S. 115C-264."
SECTION 4.6. G.S. 116-239.8(b)(4)c. reads as rewritten:
"c. Food Nutrition Services. – The laboratory school shall strive to ensure
that one hundred percent (100%) muscadine grape juice is made
available to students as a part of the school's nutrition program or
through the operation of the school's vending facilities. Laboratory
schools shall provide school nutrition services in accordance with
G.S. 115C-263 and G.S. 115C-264. Upon request, the local school
administrative unit in which the laboratory school is located shall
administer the National School Lunch Program for the laboratory
school in accordance with G.S. 115C-264.school."
SECTION 4.7. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of one hundred fifteen million dollars ($115,000,000) in recurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to provide lunch to students in public school units at no cost
to the students in accordance with this section. Should this appropriation not be sufficient to
fulfill the provisions of this section for the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the State Board of Education
may use funds appropriated to State Aid for Public Schools for this purpose.
SECTION 4.8. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Public Instruction the sum of three million one hundred sixty-six thousand six hundred dollars
($3,166,600) in nonrecurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to satisfy any outstanding
school nutrition program debt. Should this appropriation not be sufficient to satisfy all school
nutrition program debt by the end of the 2025-2026 fiscal year, the State Board of Education
shall use funds appropriated to State Aid for Public Schools for this purpose.
SECTION 4.9. The State Board of Education is granted authority to adopt temporary
rules to enact this section until permanent rules are adopted.

PART V. FUNDS FOR PUBLIC CHILD CARE PROVIDED BY COMMUNITY
COLLEGES
Page 4 House Bill 316-First Edition

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
SECTION 5.1. Appropriation. – There is appropriated from the General Fund to the
Community Colleges System Office the sum of ten million dollars ($10,000,000) in nonrecurring
funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year to be allocated in accordance with this section among
community colleges with an active child care program that is available to the public to support
and maintain that program. The State Board of Community Colleges shall adopt a formula for
allocating these funds. Funds shall be allocated based on the number of children served by the
program, and the State Board shall prioritize the award of funds based on the financial needs of
the program. These funds shall not revert at the end of the 2025-2026 fiscal year but shall remain
available until expended.
SECTION 5.2. Report. – Any community college that does not have a publicly
available child care program shall report to the State Board of Community Colleges on the
feasibility and advisability of implementing a publicly available child care program at that
community college, including recommendations for implementing such a child care program,
estimated costs, and barriers to implementation. The State Board shall aggregate that information
and report it to the Joint Legislative Education Oversight Committee no later than March 31,
2026.

PART VI. REPORT ON HIGH SCHOOL CHILD CARE APPRENTICESHIP
PROGRAM
SECTION 6.1. No later than December 31, 2026, the Department of Public
Instruction, in consultation with each partner agency, shall report to the Joint Legislative
Education Oversight Committee on the feasibility and advisability of implementing a child care
apprenticeship program in public high schools. The report shall include at least the following
information:
(1) Estimated costs and a time line for implementing a statewide or regional child
care apprenticeship program.
(2) Expected student and community impacts of a child care apprenticeship
program, including impacts on student performance, attrition, well-being, and
any other factor the Department deems relevant to the report.
SECTION 6.2. No later than February 28, 2027, the Joint Legislative Education
Oversight Committee shall hold a committee meeting and receive an in-person presentation from
the Department, in partnership with each partner agency, on the report provided pursuant to
Section 6.1 of this act.
SECTION 6.3. For purposes of this section, the term "partner agency" shall refer to
the Department of Health and Human Services, the Board of Governors of The University of
North Carolina, and the State Board of Community Colleges.

PART VII. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 7.1. Part I of this act is effective for taxable years beginning on or after
January 1, 2025. The remainder of this act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
House Bill 316-First Edition Page 5